Utah statutes.
59-2-1351.   Sales by county -- Notice of tax sale -- Entries on record.

(1) (a)  Upon receiving the tax sale listing from the county treasurer, the county auditor shall  select a date for the tax sale for all real property on which a delinquency exists that was not previously redeemed and upon which the period of redemption is expiring in the nearest tax sale.

(b)  The tax sale shall be conducted in May or June of the current year.

(2)  Notice of the tax sale shall be provided as follows:

(a)  sent by certified and first class mail to the last-known recorded owner, the occupant of any improved property, and all other interests of record, as of the preceding March 15, at their last-known address; and

(b)  published:

(i)  four times in a newspaper published and having general circulation in the county, once in each of four successive weeks immediately preceding the date of sale; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for four weeks immediately preceding the date of sale; and

(c)  if no newspaper is published in the county, posted in five public places in the county, as determined by the auditor, at least 25 but no more than 30 days prior to the date of sale.

(3)  The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF TAX SALE

Notice is hereby given that on __________(month\day\year), at __ o'clock __.  m., at the front door of the county courthouse in ____ County, Utah, I will offer for sale at public auction and sell to the highest bidder for cash, under the provisions of Section 59-2-1351.1, the following described real property located in the county and now delinquent and subject to tax sale.  A bid for less than the total amount of taxes, interest, penalty, and administrative costs which are a charge upon the real estate will not be accepted.

(Here describe the real estate)

IN WITNESS WHEREOF I have hereunto set my hand and official seal on __________(month\day\year).

_______________

County Auditor

_______________

County

(4) (a)  The notice sent by certified mail in accordance with Subsection (2)(a) shall include:

(i)  the name and last-known address of the last-known recorded owner of the property to be sold;

(ii)  the parcel, serial, or account number of the delinquent property; and

(iii)  the legal description of the delinquent property.

(b)  The notice published in a newspaper in accordance with Subsection (2)(b) shall include:

(i)  the name and last-known address of the last-known recorded owner of each parcel of property to be sold; and

(ii)  the street address or the parcel, serial, or account number of the delinquent parcels.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

